Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1464.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "comparable replacement dwelling" in section 103 of Title 26 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 103. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have the meanings given to them in this 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Comparable replacement dwelling." A dwelling that is:(1) Decent, safe and sanitary.(2) Adequate in size to accommodate the occupants.(3) Within the financial means of the displaced person.(4) Functionally equivalent.(5) In an area not subject to unreasonable adverse environmental conditions.(6) In a location generally not less desirable than the location of the displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities, facilities, services and the displaced person's place of employment.(7) Within the same school district as the condemned dwelling if any of the occupants in the condemned dwelling is a child that, at the time of condemnation, attends a school within the school district in which the condemned dwelling is located.* * *"Continuous ownership." A continuous and unbroken chain of ownership of a property by a condemnee and the family of the condemnee as provided under section 1107 (relating to proof of continuous ownership).* * *"Marginalized community." A group of people who experience social, economic or political exclusion or discrimination based on characteristics such as race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, disability or religion.* * *"Replacement value." A valuation completed by an impartial 20250HB1464PN1724 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expert appraiser that is calculated as the summation of the following:(1) The fair market value of the land as if the land was vacant.(2) The cost of replacing or duplicating existing structures on the land, including machinery, equipment or fixtures, adjusting for depreciation.* * *Section 2. Title 26 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 304.1. Advanced notice to condemnee.(a) Written advanced notice.--Within 30 days prior to the filing of a declaration of taking, the acquiring agency shall provide written notice to a proposed condemnee, mortgagee of record and lienholder of record.(b) Service.--The advanced notice shall be served in the same manner as required for the notice under section 305(b) (relating to notice to condemnee).(c) Contents.--The advanced notice shall include:(1) The name of the proposed condemnee to whom the proposed condemnation is directed.(2) A statement that the acquiring agency intends to file a declaration of taking for the acquisition of the proposed condemnee's property no less than 30 days from the date of the advanced notice.(3) The name, address and contact information, including a telephone number and email address, at which a representative of the acquiring agency can be reached.(4) A statement that the proposed condemnee's property or portion of the property may be condemned for the purposes of the acquiring agency's program or project.20250HB1464PN1724 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A brief description of the purpose of the proposed condemnation, including the acquiring agency's proposed project.(6) A brief description of the condemnation process in this Commonwealth, including all of the following:(i) What eminent domain is.(ii) The rights of a condemnee under law, including the right to hire a lawyer to help guide the condemnee through the condemnation process.(iii) How just compensation is determined and made or secured under the laws of this Commonwealth.(iv) That the use of eminent domain is of last resort.(v) The next steps the acquiring agency will take if the proposed condemnee's property is subject to a declaration of taking.(vi) The process by which the proposed condemnee may challenge the power or the right of the acquiring agency to appropriate the condemned property, the sufficiency of the security, whether the use of eminent domain is of last resort , the procedure followed by the acquiring agency or the declaration of taking.(d) Proof of service and compliance.--Filing of a copy of the advanced notice and proof of service of the advanced notice, together with the filing of the declaration of taking and security as required under sections 302 (relating to declaration of taking) and 303 (relating to security required), shall constitute compliance with the notice requirements of this section.(e) Publication.--Within 24 hours of issuing advanced notice 20250HB1464PN1724 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to a proposed condemnee under subsection (a), an acquiring agency shall post the advanced notice on the acquiring agency's publicly accessible Internet website, if available, and at the acquiring agency's principal office location.Section 3. Section 305(c)(13) of Title 26 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 305. Notice to condemnee.* * *(c) Contents.--The notice to be given the condemnee shall state:* * *(12.1) A statement that the use of eminent domain is of last resort.(13) A statement that, if the condemnee wishes to challenge the power or the right of the condemnor to appropriate the condemned property, the sufficiency of the security, whether the use of eminent domain is of last resort , the procedure followed by the condemnor or the declaration of taking, the condemnee must file preliminary objections within 30 days after being served with notice of condemnation.* * *Section 4. Section 306(a)(3) of Title 26 is amended by adding a subparagraph and subsection (f) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 306. Preliminary objections.(a) Filing and exclusive method of challenging certain matters.--* * *(3) Preliminary objections shall be limited to and shall 20250HB1464PN1724 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be the exclusive method of challenging:* * *(iii.1) Whether the use of eminent domain is of last resort.* * *(f) Disposition.--* * *(4) For a preliminary objection under subsection(a)(3)(iii.1), the court shall make a determination of last resort in accordance with section 306.1 (relating to determination of last resort).* * *Section 5. Title 26 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 306.1. Determination of last resort.(a) Blighted properties excluded.--A blighted property shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.(b) Condemnor requirement.--If a condemnee files a preliminary objection under section 306(a)(3)(iii.1) (relating to preliminary objections), the condemnor shall submit the following to the court within 30 days of filing of the preliminary objection:(1) The alternatives that were considered, including:(i) Alternatives that did not involve the use of eminent domain for the program or project.(ii) Alternatives that involve the use of eminent domain but condemn fewer properties.(iii) Alternatives that involve the use of eminent domain but would not disproportionately affect a marginalized community.(2) A statement outlining why the specified exercise of 20250HB1464PN1724 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the power of eminent domain to take private property is the only feasible option among the alte rnatives. The statement shall include the following:(i) Evidence that the condemnor fully considered if the benefits of the program or project outweigh the negative impacts of the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property on the surrounding community.(ii) Evidence that the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property would not exacerbate existing inequities in the surrounding community.(3) Evidence that a comparable replacement dwelling is available to the condemnee.(c) Determination of last resort.--(1) Within 30 days after the condemnor submits the content under subsection (b) to the court, the court shall determine whether the condemnor sufficiently demonstrates that the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property is the last resort. The court shall grant determination of last resort if any of the following is satisfied:(i) The condemnor demonstrates the condemnor fully considered if the benefits of the program or project outweigh the negative impacts of the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property on the surrounding community.(ii) The condemnor demonstrates the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property would not disproportionately affect a marginalized community.20250HB1464PN1724 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The condemnor demonstrates that the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property outlined in the declaration of taking is the only feasible option among the alternatives considered.(iv) The condemnor demonstrates that a comparable replacement dwelling is available to the condemnee.(2) The court shall make the determination of last resort by considering the content provided by the condemnor under subsection (b).(3) If the court determines that the exercise of the power of eminent domain to take private property is the last resort, the use of eminent domain may proceed.(4) If the court determines that the exercise of the power of eminent domain is not the last resort, the court shall provide a statement to the condemnor outlining why the determination was not granted and provide the condemnor 45 days to remedy the insufficiency.Section 6. Section 521(a)(1) of Title 26 is amended to read:§ 521. Liens and distribution of damages.(a) Liens.--(1) Damages payable to a condemnee under sections 701 (relating to just compensation; other damages) through 707 (relating to removal of machinery, equipment or fixtures), 713 (relating to delay compensation), 714 (relating to consequential damages), 715 (relating to damages for vacation of roads) and 902(b)(1) and (2) (relating to moving and related expenses of displaced persons) shall be subject to a lien for all taxes and municipal claims assessed against the property and to all mortgages, judgments and other liens of record against the property for which the particular damages 20250HB1464PN1724 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are payable, existing at the date of the [filing of the declaration of taking.] written advanced notice as provided under section 304.1 (relating to advanced notice to condemnee).* * *Section 7. Section 702(a) of Title 26 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 702. Measure of damages.(a) Just compensation.--(1) Just compensation shall [consist of] be the higher of the following:(i) the difference between the fair market value of the condemnee's entire property interest immediately before the condemnation and as unaffected by the condemnation and the fair market value of the property interest remaining immediately after the condemnation and as affected by the condemnation[.]; and(ii) the replacement value of the condemnee's property interest.(2) The just compensation under paragraph (1)(ii) shall not exceed 200% of the value of paragraph (1)(i).* * *(d) Augmentation of just compensation.--If a condemnee provides the acquiring agency or court evidence showing proof of continuous ownership as provided under section 1107 (relating to proof of continuous ownership), the amount awarded under subsection (a) shall be augmented by an additional 1% for each year of continuous ownership. The amount of augmentation shall be no greater than 15% of the amount awarded under subsection (a).20250HB1464PN1724 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Blighted property.--If a condemned property is a blighted property, the just compensation for the blighted property shall be the difference between the fair market value of the condemnee's entire property interest immediately before the condemnation and as unaffected by the condemnation and the fair market value of the property interest remaining immediately after the condemnation and as affected by the condemnation. The blighted property shall not be eligible for augmentation of just compensation as provided in subsection (d).Section 8. Title 26 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 717. Compensation for loss of goodwill of business or farm operation.(a) Compensation .--The owner of a business or farm operation conducted on the property taken under this title shall be compensated for loss of goodwill if the owner proves all of the following:(1) The loss is caused by the taking of the property . (2) Compensation for the loss will not be duplicated in the compensation otherwise awarded to the owner.(3) Both the acquiring agency and the owner did not enter into negotiations to acquire the property before filing a declaration of taking.(b) Rebuttal of compensation.--The acquiring agency may rebut the compensation provided under subsection (a) if the acquiring agency proves that the loss could have reasonably been prevented by a relocation of the business or farm operation or by taking steps and adopting procedures that a reasonably prudent person would take or adopt in preserving the goodwill.(c) Leaseback agreement.--If the acquiring agency and the owner of a business or farm operation enter into a leaseback 20250HB1464PN1724 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement, the following shall apply:(1) No additional goodwill shall accrue during the lease.(2) The entering of a leaseback agreement shall not be a factor in determining goodwill, and any liability for goodwill shall be established and paid at the time of acquisition of the property by eminent domain or subsequent to notice that the property may be taken by eminent domain.(d) Use of State tax returns.--(1) If the owner of a business or farm operation and the acquiring agency do not agree on the value of goodwill, the owner shall make available to the board of viewers or court, and the board of viewers or court shall, upon terms and conditions that will preserve confidentiality, make available to the acquiring agency, the State tax returns of the business or farm operation. The acquiring agency shall review the State tax returns solely for the purpose of determining the amount of compensation under this section.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any right a party may otherwise have to discovery or to require the production of documents, papers, books and accounts.(e) Blighted property.--A blighted property shall not be eligible for compensation for loss of goodwill in accordance with this section.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Goodwill." The benefits that accrue to a business or farm operation as a result of its location, cultural heritage value 20250HB1464PN1724 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the community, reputation for dependability, skill or quality and any other circumstance resulting in probable retention of old or acquisition of new patronage.§ 1107. Proof of continuous ownership.(a) Eligibility.--A condemnee shall be eligible for augmentation of just compensation as provided under section 702(d) (relating to measure of damages) if the condemnee provides evidence to the acquiring agency or court showing proof of continuous ownership.(b) Establishing continuous ownership.--Proof of continuous ownership of a property may be established through evidence of ownership of the property by the condemnee and the family of the condemnee, which shall include siblings, parents, grandparents, aunts or uncles of the condemnee or the spouse of the condemnee.(c) Burden of proof.--The condemnee shall have the burden of providing continuous ownership to the acquiring agency or court.Section 9. This act shall apply retroactively to a declaration of taking filed on or after January 1, 2024.Section 10. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1464PN1724 - 12 - 12345678910111213141516171819